Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2502
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Controlled Substances Animal Welfare Act is to allow animal welfare organizations to obtain proper controlled substances for the purpose of humane euthanasia of seized, stray, injured, sick, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted domesticated and nondomesticated or wild animals.

Laws 1999, LB 573, § 2.